Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-309
Zoning regulations; requirements; reasonable.

All airport zoning regulations adopted under sections 3-301 to 3-333 shall be reasonable and not impose any requirement or restriction which is not reasonably necessary to effectuate the purposes of sections 3-301 to 3-333. In determining what regulations it may adopt, each political subdivision and joint airport zoning board shall consider, among other things, the character of the flying operations expected to be conducted at the airport, the nature of the terrain within the airport hazard area, the character of the neighborhood and the uses to which the property to be zoned is put and adaptable.

Laws 1945, c. 233, § 6(1), p. 685.